California, session 20252026, AB452.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a process for state designated surfing reserves in order to recognize the cultural, historical, economic, and ecological importance of California’s waves, surf zones, and their surrounding environments.SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) In October 2020, Governor Gavin Newsom issued Executive Order No. N-82-20 to establish a state goal of conserving 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030, known as the 30x30 goal.(b) The 30x30 goal is intended to help conserve California lands and coastal waters through voluntary, collaborative action with partners across the state to meet three objectives: conserving and restoring biodiversity, expanding access to nature, and mitigating and building resilience to climate change.(c) California’s 30x30 commitment is part of a global effort to increase biodiversity conservation, including in the United States.(d) In 2023, the Legislature enacted Senate Bill 337 (Chapter 392 of the Statutes of 2023) to codify into law the state goal to conserve 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030.(e) As of June 2024, 25.2 percent of California’s lands and 16.2 percent of its coastal waters are under long-term conservation and care for the benefit of plant, animal, and human communities.(f) California’s coastline is rich with multiple areas long surfed by residents and tourists alike. According to the National Oceanographic and Atmospheric Administration, California is home to the highest number of individuals who surf in the nation.(g) In recognition of the importance and contributions of surfing to California, in 2018, the Legislature enacted Assembly Bill 1782 (Chapter 162 of the Statutes of 2018) designating surfing the official sport of California. That same year, the Legislature named September 20 as California Surfing Day.(h) Designating areas of California’s coast as surfing reserves will both maintain those surfing spots for future generations and can help the state advance its 30x30 goals through the conservation of those coastal waters.SEC. 2. Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 31450) is added to Division 21 of the Public Resources Code, to read: CHAPTER 11. State Designated State-Designated Surfing Reserves31450. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Local government” means a city council or a county board of supervisors.(b) “Surfing reserve” means an area designated pursuant to this chapter that would feature protected waves, surf zones, and surrounding environments and would environments, recognize the surfing area’s environmental, cultural, and historical significance. significance, and meet the Ocean Protection Council’s standard as an “other effective area-based conservation measure” as described in the “30x30 Decision-Making Framework for Coastal Waters.”31451. (a) On or before July 1, 2026, the conservancy shall establish criteria and an application process for purposes of designating an area of the coastline as a state surfing reserve. The conservancy may require, as one of the criterion, a letter of recommendation for the designation of a state surfing reserve from the commission.(b) When establishing criteria for purposes of the state surfing reserve designation, the conservancy shall consider factors, including, but not limited to, wave quality and consistency, surf culture and history, and environmental characteristics. environmental characteristics, and management priorities.31452. (a) After adopting a formal resolution, a local government may apply to the conservancy for purposes of designating an area of the coastline within the jurisdiction of the local government as a state surfing reserve. (b) The local government shall include in its application a all of the following:(1) A description of the proposed surfing reserve, including the specific geographic location and a coastal access.(2) A description of the cultural, historical, ecological, and economic value of the proposed surfing reserve, in addition to any other eligibility criteria required by the conservancy. reserve.(3) Management priorities for the surfing reserve.(4) Any other eligibility criteria required by the conservancy.(c) (1) The conservancy shall approve the application from the local government if the area of the coastline meets the criteria established pursuant to Section 31451.(2) Once the application is approved, the conservancy shall designate the area as a state surfing reserve and shall include this designation, where appropriate, in publications or maps that are issued by the conservancy. reserve.(3) The conservancy shall, as appropriate, and upon appropriation by the Legislature, publicize approved surfing reserves and partner with local governments to erect signs designating approved surfing reserves.(4) The conservancy may accept donations for the purposes of paragraph (3).(d) If, at any time, the conservancy determines that the designated state surfing reserve no longer meets the criteria established pursuant to Section 31451, the conservancy may revoke its designation as a state surfing reserve.31453. The conservancy shall transmit a notice of approval of designated state surfing reserves to the Ocean Protection Council for consideration and inclusion in the state’s goal to conserve at least 30 percent of coastal waters pursuant to Senate Bill 337 (Chapter 392 of the Statutes of 2023).